Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Not later than January 1 of each odd-numbered year, each public  uni-
versity listed in ORS 352.002 shall submit to the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission
a report that is a concise narrative identifying:
(a) Legislative mandates imposed on public universities;
(b) The impact of the legislative mandates on the costs of higher education  at the public
university;
(c) The  causes of any increase in administrative positions occurring at the public uni-
versity;
(d) The actions that have been taken at the public university to monitor and  control cost
drivers, such as administrative services; and
(e) Any  other relevant matter the public university considers important to include in the
report.
(2) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall compile a report from the re-
ports received by  the commission pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and submit the
compiled report in the manner required under ORS 192.245 to the Joint Committee on  Ways
and Means as part of the commission’s budget presentation during each regular session of
the Legislative Assembly held during an odd-numbered year.
SECTION 2.
A public university shall  submit the first report required under section 1 (1)
of this 2017 Act not later than January 1, 2019.
Enrolled House Bill 3288 (HB 3288-B) Page 1
Passed by House April 27, 2017
Repassed by House June 12, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 7, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3288 (HB 3288-B) Page 2